Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

6-18-101 to 6-18-103. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part repealed, p. 1011, § 23, effective August 4.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1994, and this part 1 was subsequently repealed in 2004. For amendments to this part 1 prior to its repeal in 2004, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.